Nevada, session 83, SB452.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 341, Statutes of Nevada 2023,
at page 1954, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 3. Any remaining balance of the appropriations
made by sections 1 and 2 of this act must not be committed
for expenditure after June 30, [2025,] 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money
from the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the appropriated money
remaining must not be spent for any purpose after September
[19, 2025,] 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was
subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to
the State General Fund on or before September [19, 2025.]
17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)